ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Ракетбол и сквош > Мячи для ракетбола и сквоша: Мячи для ракетбола; Мячи для сквоша
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Racketboll och squash > Bollar till racketboll och squash: Racquetbollar; Squashbollar
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Raquetebol e squash > Bolas para raquetebol e squash: Bolas de raquetebol; Bolas de squash
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Raketball és squash > Raketball és squash labdák: Racquetball labdák; Squash labdák
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Raketbolas ir skvošas > Raketbolo ir skvošo kamuoliukai: Raketbolo kamuoliukai; Skvošo kamuoliukai
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Racquetball og squash > Bolde til racquetball og squash: Bolde til racquetball; Squashbolde
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ракетбол и скуош > Топки за ракетбол и скуош: Топки за ракетбол; Топки за скуош
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Racquetball i squash > Piłki do racquetballa i squasha: Piłki do racquetballa; Piłki do squasha
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Racquetball og squash > Baller for racquetball og squash: Racquetball-baller; Squashballer
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 短网拍墙球/壁球 > 短网拍墙球/壁球用球: 墙球; 壁球
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Raketbal a squash > Raketbalové a squashové loptičky: Raketbaly; Squashové loptičky
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Reketbol i skvoš > Loptice za reketbol i skvoš: Lopte za reketbol; Loptice za skvoš
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ρακέτα και σκουός > Μπάλες ρακέτας & σκουός: Μπαλάκια ράκετμπολ; Μπαλάκια σκουός
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スカッシュ・ラケットボール > スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ボール: ラケットボール; スカッシュボール
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Racquetball et squash > Balles de racquetball et de squash: Balles de racquetball; Balles de squash
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Racquetball e squash > Palle da racquetball e da squash: Palline da racquetball; Palline da squash
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng quần > Quả bóng quần: Bóng Racquetball; Bóng quần
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Ráquetbol y squash > Pelotas de ráquetbol y squash: Pelotas de racquetball; Pelotas de squash
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Squash e raquetebol > Bolas de squash e raquetebol: Bolas de raquetebol; Bolas de squash
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แร็กเกตบอลและสควอช > ลูกบอลของแร็กเกตบอลและสควอช: ลูกแร็กเก็ตบอล; ลูกสควอช
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Racquetball ja squash > Racquetball- ja squash-pallot: Racquetball-pallot; Squash-pallot
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Racquetball in skvoš > Žogice za igranje racquetballa in skvoša: Žoge za racquetball; Žogice za skvoš
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball- & Squash-Bälle: Racquetbälle; Squashbälle
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 공: 라켓볼; 스쿼시 볼
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 短柄牆球/壁球 > 短柄牆球/壁球用球: 短柄牆球; 壁球
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball & Squash Balls: Racquetballs; Squash Balls
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Racquetball en squash > Ballen voor racquetball en squash: Racquetball-ballen; Squashballen
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Racquetball ve Squash > Racquetball ve Squash Topları: Raketbol topları; Squash topları
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Racquetball și squash > Mingi pentru racquetball și squash: Mingi de racquetball; Mingi de squash
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Raketbal a squash > Míče na raketbal a squash: Míčky na racquetball; Squashové míčky